Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1445XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1445XD (5) 91
sb/js

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 34A.2, subsection 17, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
17. “Next generation 911 network service provider” “Next
generation 911 core service provider” means a vendor or
vendors selected by the department of homeland security and
emergency management to provide next generation 911 network
functionality.
Sec. 2. Section 34A.7A, subsection 2, paragraph b,
subparagraph (2), unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
The amount allocated under this paragraph “b” shall be sixty
fifty-five percent of the total amount of surcharge generated
per calendar quarter allocated as follows:
Sec. 3. Section 34A.7A, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code
2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph:
NEW SUBPARAGRAPH. (4) Notwithstanding subparagraph (2),
the amount allocated under this paragraph “b” shall be forty-six
percent until completion of phase 1 and phase 2 of the next
generation 911 transition as described in 47 C.F.R. pt. 9,
subpt. J. This subparagraph is repealed upon completion of
phase 1 and phase 2 of the next generation 911 transition
as described in 47 C.F.R. pt. 9, subpt. J. The department
shall notify the Iowa Code editor upon the occurrence of this
condition.
Sec. 4. Section 34A.7A, subsection 2, paragraph d,
subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(1) The program manager shall reimburse next generation 911
network core service providers, 911 call processing equipment
providers, and 911 call transport providers, and third-party
911 automatic location identification database providers on
a calendar quarterly basis for the costs of maintaining and
upgrading the next generation 911 network functionality, 911
call processing equipment, and 911 call transport from the
next generation 911 network to public safety answering points
and from the wireless originating service provider network to
LSB 1445XD (5) 91
-1- sb/js 1/6

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
the next generation 911 network, and the automatic location
identification database.
Sec. 5. Section 34A.7A, subsection 2, paragraph f,
subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (a), Code 2025, is
amended by striking the subparagraph division.
Sec. 6. Section 34A.8, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
34A.8 Local exchange service information —— penalty.
1. A local exchange service provider shall furnish to
the next generation 911 network core service provider,
designated by the department of homeland security and
emergency management, all names, addresses, and telephone
number information concerning its subscribers which that
will be served by the next generation 911 network and shall
periodically update the local exchange service information.
The 911 service provider shall furnish the addresses
and telephone number information received from the local
exchange service provider to the director for use in the
mass notification and emergency messaging system as defined
in section 29C.2. The local exchange service provider shall
receive as compensation for the provision of local exchange
service information charges according to its tariffs on file
with and approved by the Iowa utilities commission. The tariff
charges shall be the same whether or not the local exchange
service provider is designated as the next generation 911
network core service provider by the department of homeland
security and emergency management.
2. a. Subscriber information remains the property of the
local exchange service provider.
b. The director, program manager, joint 911 service board,
local emergency management commission established pursuant to
section 29C.9, the designated next generation 911 network core
service provider, and the public safety answering point, and
their agents, employees, and assigns, shall use local exchange
service information provided by the local exchange service
LSB 1445XD (5) 91
-2- sb/js 2/6

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
provider solely for the purposes of providing 911 emergency
telephone service or providing related mass notification and
emergency messaging services as described in section 29C.17A
utilizing only the subscriber’s information, and local exchange
service information shall otherwise be kept confidential.
A person who violates this paragraph is guilty of a simple
misdemeanor.
c. This chapter does not require a local exchange service
provider to sell or provide its subscriber names, addresses,
or telephone number information to any person other than the
designated next generation 911 network core service provider.
Sec. 7. PUBLIC SAFETY ANSWERING POINT STUDY. The department
of homeland security and emergency management shall study and
make recommendations to the general assembly by January 1,
2026, regarding the following topics:
1. The concept of public safety answering point managed
service where one or more public safety answering points could
enter into an agreement with another public safety answering
point or joint service board for the sharing of management,
staffing, policies and procedures, and equipment and systems.
2. When the managed public safety answering point could
operate at less than every hour of every day as needed while
calls for the service area are answered by the managing public
safety answering point.
3. Recommendations for funding arrangements and terminology
for the managed public safety answering point and managing
public safety answering point.
4. Identification of technical and operational
considerations for public safety answering points entering into
an agreement.
5. Identification of points where consolidation of systems
and equipment are feasible.
Sec. 8. TRANSITION PROVISIONS.
1. It is the intent of this Act to implement the
requirements of 47 C.F.R. pt. 9, subpt. J, to facilitate the
LSB 1445XD (5) 91
-3- sb/js 3/6

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
transition to next generation 911 by originating service
providers.
2. To further the development of the next generation 911
network in the state, the department of homeland security
and emergency management is directed to work with the Iowa
communications network to procure and implement new internet
protocol routers for ingress by local exchange providers in a
fashion that ensures modernization, redundancy, and resiliency
of the next generation 911 network. Upon completion, the
department of homeland security and emergency management shall
notify the current legacy 911 selective router provider to
decommission the existing legacy 911 selective routers.
3. Between the effective date of this Act and June 30, 2026,
the department of homeland security and emergency management
shall begin the process of preparing to fund wireline cost
recovery. During this time period, the responsibility to
fund wireline cost recovery shall remain with the joint 911
service board where applicable and as current practice exists
immediately prior to the effective date of this Act.
4. Beginning July 1, 2026, and continuing until a valid
phase 1 request is in place as described in 47 C.F.R. pt. 9,
subpt. J, wireline cost recovery shall be the responsibility of
the department of homeland security and emergency management.
The responsibility to fund wireline cost recovery once a valid
phase 1 request is in place shall follow the procedures set
forth in 47 C.F.R. pt. 9, subpt. J.